Louisiana, session 2026, SB329.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Art. 610 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-37 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 329
Art. 610. Reporting procedure; reports to the legislature and the United States
Department of Defense Family Advocacy Program
A. A reporter shall immediately report to the Department of Children and
Family Services as provided in Subparagraph (4) suspected child abuse or neglect
or that child abuse or neglect was a contributing factor in a child's death. in the
following ways:
(1) To the Department of Children and Family Services The department
shall initiate and conduct an investigation pursuant to Article 612 if the reporter
has communicates reason to believe that the perpetrator is any of the following:
(a) A parent or caretaker as defined in Article 603.
(b) A person who maintains an interpersonal dating or engagement
relationship with the parent or caretaker.
(c) A person living in the same residence as the parent or caretaker.
(d) A person living in the same residence as the child, or any residence of the
child, if the child has more than one residence.
(e) An employee or an operator of an early learning center as defined in R.S.
17:407.33.
(f) An operator or employee of a registered family child day care home.
(g) Another child residing in the same residence for cases of suspected sexual
abuse.
(h) Indeterminable by the mandatory reporter, but the reporter suspects that
the abuse occurred at the child's residence.
(2) To a The department shall send the report to the appropriate local or
state law enforcement agency pursuant to Paragraph E and law enforcement
shall initiate and conduct an investigation if the reporter has communicates
reason to believe that the perpetrator is any of the following:
(a) A person other than a person provided for in Subparagraph (1) of this
Paragraph.
(b) A teacher, instructor, administrator, staff person, school bus driver,
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-37 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 329
teacher aide, paraprofessional, food service worker, or employee of any public or
private elementary, secondary, vocational-technical training, special, or
postsecondary school, city, parish, or other local public school board, if the abuse or
neglect is perpetrated on a student.
(c) Another child who does not reside in the same residence for cases of
suspected sexual abuse.
(3) Dual reporting to both the department and the local or state law
enforcement agency is permitted. However, the agency who receives a report
pursuant to Subparagraph (1) or (2) of this Paragraph shall be the agency responsible
for accepting and acting on the report and shall ensure referral to other agencies as
necessary.
(4) Reports to the department shall be made as follows:
(a) A mandatory reporter shall make a report of suspected abuse or neglect
requiring immediate assistance via the designated state child protection reporting
hotline telephone number. A report of suspected abuse or neglect which is of a
nonemergency nature may be reported via the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Mandated Reporter Portal online. Reports may also be made in
person at any child welfare office. In receiving any report of child abuse or
neglect, the department and law enforcement shall clearly inform the reporter
that, unless the reporter requests anonymity, the department and law
enforcement may contact the reporter directly to obtain further information
during the investigation.
* * *
D. If the initial report was in oral form by a mandatory reporter, it shall be
followed by a written report made within five days via the online Mandated Reporter
Portal of the department or by mail to the centralized intake unit of the department
at the address provided on the website of the department; or, if necessary, to the local
law enforcement agency. The reporter may use a form for the written report, which
shall be developed, approved, and made available by the Department of Children and
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-37 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 329
Family Services. The form is optional and may be available electronically on the
department's website.
E.D.(1) All reports made to any local or state law enforcement agency
involving abuse or neglect in which an individual provided for in Subparagraph
(A)(1) of this Article is believed responsible shall be reported to the department
within twenty-four hours in accordance with Paragraph A of this Article.
* * *
F.E. Any commercial film or photographic print processor who has
knowledge of or observes, within the scope of this professional capacity or
employment, any film, photograph, video tape, negative, or slide depicting a child
who he knows or should know is under the age of seventeen years, which constitutes
child pornography or child sexual abuse materials as defined in Article 603, shall
report immediately to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the
case. The reporter shall provide a copy of the film, photograph, videotape, negative,
or slide to the agency receiving the report.
G.F.(1) If a physician has cause to believe that a newborn was exposed in
utero to an unlawfully used controlled dangerous substance, as defined by R.S.
40:961 et seq., the physician shall order a toxicology test upon the newborn, without
the consent of the newborn's parents or guardian, to determine whether there is
evidence of prenatal neglect. If the test results are positive, the physician shall issue
a report, as soon as possible, in accordance with this Article. If the test results are
negative, all identifying information shall be obliterated if the record is retained,
unless the parent approves the inclusion of identifying information. Positive test
results shall not be admissible in a criminal prosecution.
* * *
H.G.(1) All instances of alleged child abuse that occur in a school setting
shall be immediately reported to the child's parent or legal guardian and to local or
state law enforcement, regardless of the alleged perpetrator.
* * *
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-37 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 329
I.H.(1) The provisions of this Paragraph shall be known and may be cited as
The Alfred C. Williams Child Protection Act.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 46:51(17) and 52.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§51. Duties of the department
The Department of Children and Family Services, through its secretary, shall
administer the public assistance and welfare laws of the state as follows:
* * *
(17) Appoint a designated department employee to have primary
responsibility for and serve as the dedicated liaison to all matters regarding
child fatalities and near fatalities, including but not limited to child death
notification to the state child ombudsman in accordance with R.S. 24:525(D)(2)
and for management of the public website on incidents involving child fatality
or near fatality in accordance with R.S. 46:52.2.
* * *
§52.2. Incidents involving fatality or near fatality; public website
The department shall promptly provide information to the public
regarding a case of child abuse or neglect that has resulted in a fatality or near
fatality on its public website as follows:
(1) The department shall provide the following preliminary information:
(a) In the case of a fatality, the name of the child who has died.
(b) The age, gender, parish, and general location of the residence of the
child who has suffered a fatality or a near fatality.
(c) The fact that a child suffered a fatality or near fatality as the result
of abuse or neglect.
(d) The name, age and city, town, or general location of the residence of
the alleged perpetrator, if available, unless the disclosure would violate any
privacy laws of this state.
(e) Whether there have been reports, or any current or past cases, of
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-37 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 329
abuse or neglect involving the child or the alleged perpetrator.
(f) Actions taken by the department in response to the fatality or near
fatality of the child.
(g) A detailed synopsis of prior reports or cases of abuse or neglect
involving the child or the alleged perpetrator and of the actions taken or
determinations made by the department in response to these reports or cases.
(2) Within ninety days after the date of the report for a case involving a
fatality or a near fatality, the department shall provide to the public a summary
report that includes any actions taken by the department in response to the
case, any changes in policies or practices that have been made to address any
issues raised in the review of the case, and any recommendations for further
changes in policies, practices, rules, or statutes to address those issues.